Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2029.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
New Section 1. The portion of K-5 highway from the junction of K-5
highway and north 18th street in Wyandotte county, then west on K-5
highway to the junction of north 38th street is hereby designated as the
Representative Rep Marvin S Robinson II memorial highway. Upon
compliance with K.S.A. 68-10,114, and amendments thereto, the secretary
of transportation shall place highway signs along the highway right-of-way
at proper intervals to indicate that the highway is the Representative Rep
Marvin S Robinson II memorial highway.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 68-1037 is hereby amended to read as follows: 68-
1037. Interstate highway 635 where it enters the state on the Kansas-
Missouri line on the north, thence south to the eastern junction with K-5
highway, thence south from the western junction with K-5 highway to the
junction with Interstate highway 35, is hereby designated as the Harry
Darby memorial highway. The secretary of transportation shall place
markers along the highway right-of-way at proper intervals to indicate that
the highway is the Harry Darby memorial highway. The secretary of

HB 2029—Am. by SC 2
transportation may accept and administer gifts and donations to aid in
obtaining and installing suitable highway signs bearing the proper
approved inscription.
Sec. 3. K.S.A. 68-1037 is hereby repealed.
Sec. 4. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book Kansas register.